Vermont, session 2025-2026, H699.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 9 V.S.A. § 2453 is amended to read:
§ 2453. PRACTICES PROHIBITED; ANTITRUST AND CONSUMER
PROTECTION
(a)(1) Unfair methods of competition in commerce and unfair or deceptive
acts or practices in commerce are hereby declared unlawful.
(2)(A) Abusive acts or practices in commerce are hereby declared
unlawful.
(B) As used in this subdivision (2), “abusive acts or practices” means
any conduct that:
VT LEG #386383 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.699
2026 Page 2 of 3
(i) materially interferes with the ability of a consumer to
understand the material risks, costs, terms, or conditions of a consumer product
or service; or
(ii) takes unreasonable advantage of:
(I) a lack of understanding on the part of the consumer of the
material risks, costs, terms, or conditions of the product or service;
(II) the inability of the consumer to protect the interests of the
consumer in selecting or using a consumer product or service; or
(III) the reasonable reliance by the consumer on a seller to act
in the interests of the consumer.
(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that in construing subsection (a)(1) of
this section, the courts of this State will be guided by the construction of
similar terms contained in Section 5(a)(1) of the Federal Trade Commission
Act as from time to time amended by the Federal Trade Commission and the
courts of the United States.
(c)(1) The Attorney General shall adopt rules, when necessary and proper
to carry out the purposes of this chapter, relating to unfair methods of
competition in commerce and unfair or deceptive acts or practices in
commerce. The rules shall not be inconsistent with the rules, regulations, and
decisions of the Federal Trade Commission and the federal courts interpreting
the Federal Trade Commission Act.
VT LEG #386383 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.699
2026 Page 3 of 3
(2) The Attorney General shall adopt rules, when necessary and proper
to carry out the purposes of this chapter, relating to abusive acts or practices in
commerce.
(d) Violation of a rule adopted by the Attorney General is prima facie proof
of the commission of an unfair or deceptive act in commerce.
(e) The provisions of subsections (a), (c), and (d) of this section shall also
be applicable to real estate transactions.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #386383 v.1